Mississippi, session 2026, HB1644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-29-701, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-701.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed to them herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Pen register" means a mechanical or electronic device that attaches to a telephone line and is capable of recording outgoing numbers dialed from that line and date, time and duration of any incoming communication to that line. (b)  "Trap and trace device" means a device which captures the incoming electronic or other signals which identifies the originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire or other communication was transmitted. (c)  "Caller ID" means a service offered by a provider of communications services which identifies either or both of the originating number or the subscriber of such number of an instrument or device from which a wire or other communication was transmitted. (2)  (a)  Attorneys for the Bureau of Narcotics, upon their own motion, may file an application with the circuit court for the installation and use of a pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID to obtain information material to an ongoing investigation of a felony violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law.  Venue under this section shall be in the circuit court district of any of the following:  (i) the county of residence of the subscriber, (ii) the county of residence of the user, (iii) the county in which the billing address is located, or (iv) the county in which the crime is allegedly being committed. (b)  The application shall be made in writing under oath and shall include the name of the subscriber, the telephone number or numbers, and the location of the telephone instrument or instruments upon which the pen register will be utilized.  The application shall also set forth facts which the court shall consider in determining that probable cause exists that the installation and utilization of the pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID will be material to an ongoing investigation of a felony violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. (c)  Upon consideration of the application and a determination that probable cause exists, the circuit court judge may order the installation and utilization of the pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID, and in the order the circuit court judge shall direct a communications common carrier, as defined by 47 USCS 153(h), to furnish all information, facilities and technical assistance necessary to facilitate the installation and utilization of the pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference to the services provided by the carrier.  The carrier is entitled to compensation at the prevailing rates for the facilities and assistance provided to the Bureau of Narcotics. (d)  An order for the installation and utilization of a pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID is valid for not more than thirty (30) days from the date the order is granted unless, prior to the expiration of the order, an attorney for the Bureau of Narcotics applies for and obtains from the court an extension of the order.  The period of extension may not exceed thirty (30) days for each extension granted. (e)  The circuit court shall seal an application and order for the installation and utilization of a pen register, trap and trace device or caller ID granted under this section. The contents of an application or order may not be disclosed except in the course of a judicial proceeding and an unauthorized disclosure is punishable as contempt of court. (3)  On or before January 5 of each year, the Director of the Bureau of Narcotics shall submit a report to the Mississippi Administrative Office of Courts detailing the number of applications for pen registers sought and the number of orders for the installation and utilization of pen registers, trap and trace devices or caller ID granted during the preceding calendar year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.